Wyoming, session 2025, SF0015.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 30-5-104(d)(vi)(A) is amended to
read:
30-5-104. Oil and gas conservation commission; powers
and duties; investigations; rules and regulations.
(d) The commission has authority:
(vi) To regulate, excluding discharges permitted
under the national pollutant discharge elimination system,
the:
(A) Location, construction, operation and
reclamation of all noncommercial reserve pits and produced
water retention and emergency overflow pits used solely for
the storage, treatment and disposal of drilling fluids,
produced waters, emergency overflow wastes or other oil
field wastes associated with the maintenance and operation
of oil and gas exploration and production wells on a lease,
unit or communitized area in such a manner as to prevent
the contamination of the waters of the state;
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0015
ENROLLED ACT NO. 1, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2